Massachusetts, session 194th, H5245.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of Children &
Families (DCF) shall establish a sick leave bank for Courtney Cochran, an employee of the
office. Any employee of the office may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or
vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Courtney Cochran. If Courtney Cochran
terminates employment with the office or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining
time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave
bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the
establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the office.
of 1